Utah statutes.
17-15-28.   Definitions -- Electronic payments -- Fee.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Electronic payment" means the payment of money to a county by electronic
means, including by means of a credit card, charge card, debit card, prepaid
or stored value card or similar device, or automatic clearinghouse
transaction.
(b)  "Electronic payment fee" means an amount of money to defray the discount
fee, processing fee, or other fee charged by a credit card company or
processing agent to process an electronic payment.
(c)  "Processing agent" means a bank, transaction clearinghouse, or other
third party that charges a fee to process an electronic payment.
(2)  A county may accept an electronic payment for the payment of funds which
the county could have received through another payment method.
(3)  A county that accepts an electronic payment may charge an electronic
payment fee.
